Maryland, session 2025, HB0158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
Subtitle 7. [Senior Call–Check Service and Notification] AND SOCIAL CONNECTIONS
Program.
– 1 –

Ch. 35 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3.5–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Eligible participant” means a resident of the State who is [at least 65 60
years old] AN OLDER ADULT WHO:
(1) IS AT RISK OF SOCIAL ISOLATION; AND
(2) WOULD BENEFIT FROM ADDITIONAL PURPOSEFUL SOCIAL
ENGAGEMENT AND WELLNESS CHECKS.
(c) “Person of record” includes a local law enforcement unit or other local
government agency OR A DESIGNEE OF THE PARTICIPANT that chooses to participate in
the Program.
(d) “Program” means the [Senior Call–Check Service and Notification] AND
SOCIAL CONNECTIONS Program.
[(e) (1) “Senior call–check service and notification AND SOCIAL
CONNECTIONS” means a telephone call made or received each day at a regularly scheduled
time by REGULAR, DIRECT COMMUNICATION FROM the Department of Aging or the
Department of Aging’s designee to the residence of an eligible participant to verify that the
participant is able to receive notifications and answer the telephone or place a call from the
telephone.
(2) “Senior call–check service and notification AND SOCIAL
CONNECTIONS” includes:
(i) an automated or live telephone call OR OTHER DIRECT
COMMUNICATION placed INITIATED by an eligible participant or received by an eligible
participant at a regularly scheduled time each day;
(ii) if the eligible participant does not answer or place INITIATE the
regularly scheduled call OR OTHER DIRECT COMMUNICATION and the Secretary of Aging
designs the Program to require this action, one or more automated or live telephone calls
OR OTHER DIRECT COMMUNICATIONS to the eligible participant;
(iii) if the eligible participant does not answer a telephone call OR
OTHER DIRECT COMMUNICATION made under item (ii) of this paragraph, an additional
automated or live telephone call OR OTHER DIRECT COMMUNICATION to notify a person
of record whose name has been provided to the Department of Aging; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 35
(iv) a notification to the eligible participant regarding information
that the Secretary of Aging has determined to be relevant.]
(E) (F) “REGULAR, DIRECT COMMUNICATION” MEANS REGULAR
INTERACTIONS INITIATED OR RECEIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING OR THE
DEPARTMENT’S DESIGNEE THAT:
(1) MAY INCLUDE TELEPHONE CALLS, TEXT MESSAGES, AND
WEB–BASED, VIRTUAL, VIDEO, OR IN–PERSON COMMUNICATIONS, AND OTHER
FORMS OF COMMUNICATION APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) ARE ACCESSIBLE TO ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANTS WITH DISABILITIES.
(F) (G) “VILLAGE” MEANS LOCAL, VOLUNTEER–LED ORGANIZATIONS
THAT AIM TO SUPPORT COMMUNITY MEMBERS WHO CHOOSE TO AGE IN PLACE,
INCLUDING BY:
(1) ORGANIZING EVENTS; AND
(2) FOSTERING SOCIAL CONNECTIONS THROUGH ACTIVITIES AND
COORDINATING VOLUNTEER HELP AT HOME USING THE
NEIGHBOR–HELPING–NEIGHBOR MODEL.
3.5–702.
[(a) The Department of Aging shall:
(1) establish and administer the Program to provide senior call–check
service and notification AND SOCIAL CONNECTIONS to eligible participants; and
(2) adopt regulations necessary to implement the Program.]
(A) THERE IS A SOCIAL CONNECTIONS PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE REGULAR, DIRECT
COMMUNICATION FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING OR THE DEPARTMENT’S
DESIGNEE TO AN ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT TO PROMOTE WELLNESS AND
PURPOSEFUL SOCIAL ENGAGEMENT.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING SHALL ESTABLISH AND ADMINISTER THE
PROGRAM.
(D) THE PROGRAM INCLUDES:
– 3 –

Ch. 35 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) AN AUTOMATED OR LIVE TELEPHONE CALL PLACED BY AN
ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT OR RECEIVED BY AN ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT OR ANOTHER
REGULAR, DIRECT COMMUNICATION TO AN ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT;
(2) IF THE ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT DOES NOT RESPOND DIRECTLY TO
THE REGULAR, DIRECT COMMUNICATION, A FOLLOW–UP DIRECT COMMUNICATION
TO THE ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT AND NOTIFICATION TO A PERSON OF RECORD
WHOSE NAME HAS BEEN PROVIDED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING; AND
(3) A NOTIFICATION TO THE ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT REGARDING
INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING HAS DETERMINED TO BE
RELEVANT.
(E) (C) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING SHALL INTEGRATE SERVICES WITH
THE TELECOMMUNICATIONS ACCESS OF MARYLAND PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 7–902 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE BY PROMOTING AWARENESS OF
THE AVAILABILITY OF ACCESSIBLE TELECOMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT AND USING
EDUCATIONAL OUTREACH MATERIALS PRODUCED BY THE TELECOMMUNICATIONS
ACCESS OF MARYLAND PROGRAM.
[(b)] (F) (D) (1) The Department of Aging may [contract] ENTER INTO
AGREEMENTS OR CONTRACTS AS APPROPRIATE with a private vendor [or], A nonprofit
organization, A VILLAGE INCORPORATED IN AND SERVING OLDER ADULTS IN THE
STATE, AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING, OR ANY OTHER PERSON to provide [the senior
call–check service and notification required under subsection (a) of this section] PROGRAM
SERVICES.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING MAY ENTER INTO INTERAGENCY
AGREEMENTS WITH OTHER STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES TO
PROVIDE PROGRAM SERVICES.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING MAY ACCEPT FUNDS PROVIDED BY
OTHER PUBLIC AND PRIVATE SOURCES, INCLUDING GIFTS AND GRANTS TO BE USED
TO PROVIDE PROGRAM SERVICES.
[(c)] (G) (E) (1) The State Tort Claims Act and the Local Government Tort
Claims Act, as appropriate, apply to a State or local unit and to an employee or agent of a
State or local unit that participates in the Program for services the unit or person provides
under the Program in accordance with regulations of the Department of Aging.
(2) A person of record [and], A PRIVATE VENDOR, A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION, A VILLAGE INCORPORATED IN AND SERVING OLDER ADULTS IN THE
STATE, AN AREA AGENCY ON AGING, ANY OTHER ENTITY UNDER AN AGREEMENT OR
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 35
CONTRACT WITH THE DEPARTMENT, OR a volunteer may not be liable for reasonable
acts or omissions directly arising from services [the person provides] PROVIDED under the
Program in accordance with regulations of the Department of Aging.
(H) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT INCLUDE
POLICY GUIDANCE AND PROGRAM STANDARDS AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE
PROGRAM.
Article – Human Services
7–806.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the programs under §
7–804(a) of this subtitle, § 7–902(a) of this title, and § 3.5–702 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article shall be funded as provided in the State budget.
(2) For fiscal year 2019 and each fiscal year thereafter, the program under
§ 3.5–702 of the State Finance and Procurement Article shall be funded at an amount that:
(i) is equal to the cost that the Department of Aging is expected to
incur for the upcoming fiscal year to provide the service and administer the program; [and]
(ii) does not exceed 5 cents per month for each account out of the
surcharge amount authorized under subsection (c) of this section; AND
(III) IS BASED ON A BUDGET DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF AGING IN COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES AND IN
CONSIDERATION OF THE FISCAL NEEDS OF THE PROGRAMS FUNDED THROUGH THE
SURCHARGES PAID UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) (1) There is a Universal Service Trust Fund created for the purpose of
paying the costs of maintaining and operating the programs under:
(i) § 7–804(a) of this subtitle, subject to the limitations and controls
provided in this subtitle;
(ii) § 7–902(a) of this title, subject to the limitations and controls
provided in Subtitle 9 of this title; and
(iii) § 3.5–702 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, subject
to the limitations and controls provided in Title 3.5, Subtitle 7 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(2) Money in the Universal Service Trust Fund shall be held in the State
Treasury.
– 5 –

Ch. 35 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Money in the Universal Service Trust Fund may only be used:
(i) to fund the costs of the programs specified in paragraph (1) of
this subsection; and
(ii) to pay for the administration of the Universal Service Trust
Fund.
(c) (1) The costs of the programs under § 7–804(a) of this subtitle, § 7–902(a)
of this title, and § 3.5–702 of the State Finance and Procurement Article shall be funded by
revenues generated by:
(i) a surcharge to be paid by the subscribers to a communications
service; and
(ii) other funds as provided in the State budget.
(2) (i) The surcharge may not exceed 18 cents per month for each
account and shall be applied to all current bills rendered for a communications service in
the State.
(ii) The surcharge is payable at the time the bills for a
communications service are due.
(3) The surcharge to be collected under this section applies only to a
communications service for which charges are billed by, or on behalf of, a communications
company to a subscriber of the communications service.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any estate of a decedent who died before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 6 –